District of Columbia statutes.
33-448

Repealed

Applicability of chapter to foreign and interstate commerce.

Repealed.

Sept. 27, 1962, 76 Stat. 648, Pub. L. 87-709, § 49
as added by Oct. 15, 1993, D.C. Law 10-34, § 2(b), 40 DCR 5764
Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-234, § 1203, 44 DCR 777
1981 Ed., § 41-148.